Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.210

Proclamations—Generally—State of emergency.

The proclamation of a state of emergency and other proclamations or orders issued by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.06.010, and 43.06.200 through 43.06.270 as now or hereafter amended shall be in writing and shall be signed by the governor and shall then be filed with the secretary of state. A proclamation of a state of emergency is effective upon the governor's signature. The governor shall give as much public notice as practical through the news media of the issuance of proclamations or orders pursuant to RCW 43.06.010, and 43.06.200 through 43.06.270 as now or hereafter amended. The state of emergency shall cease to exist upon the issuance of a proclamation of the governor declaring its termination: PROVIDED, That the governor must terminate said state of emergency proclamation when order has been restored in the area affected.

[ 2013 c 21 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 328 s 12; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 108 s 27; 1969 ex.s. c 186 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 328: See note following RCW 43.21G.010.

Severability—Effective date—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 108: See notes following RCW 43.21F.010.

Energy supply emergencies: Chapter 43.21G RCW.